Hawaii statutes.
§150A-6 Soil, plants, animals, etc.,
importation or possession prohibited. No person shall transport, receive
for transport, or cause to be transported to the State, for the purpose of
debarkation or entry thereinto, any of the following:

(1) Soil; provided that limited quantities of soil
may be imported into the State for experimental or other scientific purposes
under permit with conditions prescribed by the department;

(2) Rocks, plants, plant products, or any article
with soil adhering thereto;

(3) Any live snake, flying fox, fruit bat, Gila
monster, injurious insect, or eels of the order Anguilliformes, or any other
animal, plant, or microorganism in any stage of development that is detrimental
or potentially harmful to agriculture, horticulture, animal or public health,
or natural resources, including native biota, or has an adverse effect on the
environment as determined by the board, except, as provided in this chapter and
provided that, notwithstanding the list of animals prohibited entry into the
State, the department may bring into and maintain in the State four live,
sterile brown tree snakes of the male sex for the purpose of research or
training of snake detector dogs, and, further, that a government agency may
bring into and maintain in the State not more than two live, nonvenomous snakes
of the male sex solely for the purpose of exhibition in a government zoo, but
only after:

(A) The board is presented with satisfactory
evidence that the sex of the snakes was established to be male prior to the
shipment; and

(B) The board gives written approval
conditioned upon such terms as the board may deem necessary, which terms shall
include measures to assure the prevention of escape, continuing supervision and
control by the board with respect to any department import under this
paragraph, and the manner in which the snakes shall be disposed of or
destroyed.

In case of the death of one or more snakes, the
department or government agency may import and maintain replacements subject to
the conditions described in this paragraph; and

(4) Any live or dead honey bees, or used bee
equipment that is not certified by the department to be free of pests; provided
that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prohibit the importation
of bee semen. [L 1973, c 69, pt of §1; am L 1974, c 232, §2; am L 1985, c 133,
§2 and c 179, §2; am L 1990, c 243, §4; am L 1994, c 48, §1; am L 1996, c 153,
§4; am L 1997, c 63, §2; am L 1998, c 10, §1, c 28, §1, and c 244, §1; am L
1999, c 21, §1 and c 177, §3; am L 2000, c 211, §4; am L 2003, c 10, §1]

Cross References

Home-based
agriculturally produced honey, see §§328-79, 80.

Honey bee exports,
see §150A-31.

Law Journals and Reviews

Crying Over Spilt
Milk: Recognizing Hawaii's Unique State Characteristics in the Context of the
Dormant Commerce Clause. 32 UH L. Rev. 513.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next